Wyoming, session 2025, SF0188.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xviii), 21-6-225,
21-7-102(a)(intro), (iii), (viii) and by creating a new
paragraph (x), 21-7-104(a), 21-7-105, 21-7-106, 21-7-109,
21-7-110(a)(intro), (c) through (e), (g), by creating new
subsections (h) through (m), by renumbering (h) as (n) and
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
by creating new subsections (o) and (p), 21-7-112 and
21-7-113 are amended to read:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:

(xviii) Establish a teacher performance
evaluation system and require the performance of each
continuing contract nonprobationary teacher to be evaluated
against the school district's standards for performance, as
submitted and approved pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(b)(xv),
once a year until the teacher has been classified as
effective under the performance evaluation system utilized
by the school district for two (2) consecutive years. Upon
a classification of effective for two (2) consecutive
years, evaluation shall occur at minimum once every three
(3) years. The teacher shall receive a copy of each
evaluation of his performance;

21-6-225. Contract rights and benefits of employees
and teachers.
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681

No contract right, fringe benefit, benefit granted under
school policies, or continuing contract status of any
employee, or any rights under the Wyoming Teachers'
Employment Act shall be denied or reduced as a result of
school district reorganization, except as provided by W.S.
21-7-111(a)(iv). The new school district shall have the
right to establish a uniform salary and benefit schedule
for employees of the previous school districts and shall
have the right to establish the length of the contract
year.

21-7-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article: the following
definitions shall apply:

(iii) "Dismissal".- means the cancellation of
any teacher's contract of employment by the board of
trustees while such the contract is in effect;. In the case
of a continuing contract teacher, dismissal shall mean
cancellation of his contract at any time other than at the
end of a school year where proper notice has been given;
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681

(viii) "Termination".- means the failure of the
board of trustees of a school district in Wyoming to
reemploy offer a teacher at the end of a school year in any
given year employed by the district a contract after the
expiration of a previous contract;

(x) "Probationary teacher" means a teacher who
has been employed by the same school district within the
state for less than three (3) consecutive school years.

21-7-104. Teacher salary increases; service credit.

(a) A continuing contract teacher shall be employed
by each a school district on a continuing basis from year
to year without annual contract renewal at basis shall be
paid a salary determined by the board of trustees of each
district, said salary subject to increases from time to
time as provided for in the salary provisions adopted by
the board.

21-7-105. Employment of teachers on contract basis;
termination of probationary teacher; notice.
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681

(a) An initial contract A teacher who has taught in
the system continuously for a period of at least ninety
(90) days shall be hired on an annual a contract basis. and

(b) A probationary teacher shall be notified in
writing of the reasons for termination, if such is the
case, no later than April 15 of each year. An initial
contract A probationary teacher's employment may be
terminated for any reason not specifically prohibited by
law., and a board is not limited to the reasons set forth
in W.S. 21-7-110(a).

(c) The notice of termination for any teacher shall
not be disseminated to the public or to prospective
employers absent the teacher's consent. Nothing contained
in this section shall limit the use of the notice in any
hearing.

21-7-106. Notice of recommendation of termination to
nonprobationary teacher; when termination effective.

SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
(a) A continuing nonprobationary teacher's employment
may be terminated for any reason not specifically
prohibited by law before the offer and acceptance of an
additional contract made under W.S. 21-7-109. A
nonprobationary teacher shall be notified of a
recommendation of termination by the superintendent or any
member of the board designated by the superintendent or
designated by the board pursuant to a majority vote of the
board by giving the teacher written notice together with
written reasons for termination on or before April 15 of
any year. Upon receipt of notice, the teacher may request a
hearing on the recommendation before an independent hearing
officer through the office of administrative hearings as
provided under W.S. 21-7-110.

(b) If ordered by the board under W.S. 21-7-110(g)
21-7-110(m), termination under recommendation shall be
effective at the end of the school year in the year in
which notice of termination is given.

21-7-109. When contract offered to and accepted by
teacher.

SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
Upon determination to offer a contract to a teacher, the
board must shall offer a the contract for the ensuing year
to each initial contract the teacher if such is to be
offered by April 15., and it must The contract shall be
accepted by the teacher by May 15 of each year offered or
the position will shall be declared open. A contract for a
probationary teacher shall not exceed one (1) year. A
contract for a nonprobationary teacher shall not exceed
four (4) years.

21-7-110. Suspension or dismissal of teachers;
termination of nonprobationary teacher; notice; hearing;
independent hearing officer; board review and decision;
appeal.

(a) The board may suspend or dismiss any teacher, or
terminate any continuing contract teacher, for any of the
following reasons:

(c) Any continuing contract teacher receiving notice
of a recommendation of termination under W.S. 21-7-106(a),
or any teacher against whom dismissal or suspension without
pay proceedings are instituted under subsection (b) of this
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
section, is entitled to a hearing before an independent
hearing officer provided through the office of
administrative hearings on the recommendation for
termination or the reasons for dismissal or suspension
without pay, upon submission of a written request to the
superintendent. The request for hearing shall be given made
within seven (7) days after receipt of notice of
termination under W.S. 21-7-106(a) or after receiving
notice of dismissal or suspension under subsection (b) of
this section. Expenses of the hearing officer shall be paid
by the school district in accordance with W.S.
9-2-2202(b)(ii).

(d) Within five (5) days after selection of receipt
of the request for hearing under subsection (c) of this
section, the hearing officer shall set the date for hearing
and notify the teacher and superintendent of the hearing
date, time and location. In no event shall the hearing
commence on a date later than forty-five (45) days after
notice under W.S. 21-7-106(a) or subsection (b) of this
section., as applicable. The hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with contested case procedures specified under
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
W.S. 9-2-2202(b). All school district records pertaining to
the teacher shall be made available to the hearing officer.

(e) At the hearing, the superintendent shall have the
burden of proving that the recommendation for termination
is based upon reasons provided in the notice of termination
submitted pursuant to W.S. 21-7-106(a) or that suspension
without pay or dismissal is based upon reasons specified in
the notice given under subsection (b) of this section., as
applicable.

(g) The board shall review the findings of fact and
recommendation submitted by the hearing officer and within
twenty (20) days after receipt, issue a written order to
either terminate, suspend without pay or dismiss the
teacher, or to retain the teacher. If the board terminates,
suspends without pay or dismisses the teacher's employment
over a recommendation by the hearing officer, for
retention, the written order of the board shall include a
conclusion together with reasons supported by the record.
A copy of the order shall be provided to the teacher and a
copy shall be entered into the school district records
pertaining to the teacher. Any action by the board pursuant
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
to this subsection shall be approved by a majority of the
duly elected members of the board.

(h) Any nonprobationary teacher receiving notice of
termination under W.S. 21-7-106(a) is entitled to a hearing
before the board on the reasons for termination upon
submission of a written request to the board. The request
for hearing shall be made not later than seven (7) days
after receipt of notice under W.S. 21-7-106(a).

(j) Not later than five (5) days after receipt of the
written request for a hearing under subsection (h) of this
section, the board shall set the date for hearing and
notify the nonprobationary teacher and superintendent of
the hearing date, time and location. In no event shall the
hearing commence on a date later than forty-five (45) days
after notice under W.S. 21-7-106(a).

(k) The hearing under subsection (h) of this section
shall be limited and shall not be subject to the contested
case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure
Act. The nonprobationary teacher shall be provided an
opportunity to present argument and may be represented by
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
counsel. The nonprobationary teacher and superintendent may
submit written evidence in the form of affidavits and
supporting documents. Oral testimony shall not be taken.
The board shall determine if termination is based upon
reasons provided in the notice of termination submitted
pursuant to W.S. 21-7-106(a).

(m) Not more than twenty (20) days after the hearing
under subsection (h) of this section, the board shall issue
a written order to either terminate or to retain the
nonprobationary teacher. If the board elects to terminate
the nonprobationary teacher, the written order shall
include a conclusion together with reasons supporting the
order. A copy of the order shall be provided to the
nonprobationary teacher and a copy shall be entered into
the school district records pertaining to the teacher. Any
action by the board pursuant to this subsection shall be
approved by a majority of the duly elected members of the
board.

(h)(n) Appeals may be taken from the order of the
board under subsections (g) and (m) of this section to the
district court as provided by the Wyoming Administrative
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681
Procedure Act. An electronic recording of hearing
proceedings may serve as the official transcript but upon
appeal, the district court may request a written transcript
of the proceedings or any portion of the proceedings. The
cost of transcribing the record shall be borne equally by
the teacher and the school district.

(o) Nothing in this section prohibits the board from
providing a probationary teacher a hearing related to
termination.

(p) A teacher suspended with pay is not entitled to a
hearing.

21-7-112. Effect on existing contracts.

The contracts of all teachers in the state of Wyoming from
and after July 1, 2012 2026, shall be subject to the
policies, rules, and regulations of the school district not
in conflict with this law or the other laws of the state of
Wyoming.

21-7-113. Application to teachers presently employed.
SF0188

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0681

The provisions of this article shall apply to all teachers
who are teaching in Wyoming on and after July 1, 2012 2026,
and shall apply regardless of whether the teacher was
employed prior to July 1, 2012 2026 as a teacher in
Wyoming.

Section 2. W.S. 21-7-102(a)(ii) and (iv), 21-7-103
and 21-7-111(a) are repealed.

Section 3. It is the intent of the legislature that
the provision of a limited hearing to a teacher receiving
notice of termination does not create any property right.
The legislature finds, determines and declares that this
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health and safety.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0188